Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.235

Teachers' retirement system salary deductions.

Every officer authorized to issue salary warrants to teachers shall deduct from the salary payments to any member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1 regularly employed an amount which will result in total deductions of six percent of the amount of earnable compensation paid in any fiscal year. These deductions shall be transmitted and reported to the retirement system as directed by the department.

[ 1991 c 35 s 52; 1967 c 50 s 5; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 14; 1955 c 274 s 20; 1947 c 80 s 43; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-62. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 5, part; 1939 c 86 s 5, part; 1937 c 221 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-6, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.430.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 50: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.